Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1047
School of cosmetology, defined.

School of cosmetology means a fixed structure or part thereof licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to serve as the site for the teaching of any or all of the practices of cosmetology to students.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 26;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-365;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 309.